pt-PT: Tipo de camião: Camião comercial; Camião de descargas; Camião de plataforma; Camioneta; Outro
nb: Truck-type: Kassebil; Dumper; Lasteplan; Pickup; Annet
cs: Typ nákladního vozidla: Skříňový nákladní vůz; Sklápěcí nákladní vůz; Nákladní vůz s plošinou; Pickup; Jiné
ko: 트럭 유형: 박스트럭; 덤프트럭; 플랫 베드 트럭; 픽업; 기타
pl: Typ wózka: Ciężarówka ze skrzynią; Wywrotka; Ciężarówka z platformą; Odbiór; Inne
ja: トラックの種類: ボックストラック; ダンプトラック; フラットベッドトラック; ピックアップ; その他
it: Tipo di camion: Camion con cassone; Autocarro con cassone ribaltabile; Autocarro a pianale; Pickup; Altro
nl: Vrachtwagentype: Bakwagen; Kiepwagen; Semi-dieplader; Pickup; Andere
sv: Lastbilstyp: Lådbil; Sopbil; Flakbil; Pickup; Övrigt
en: Truck type: Box truck; Dump truck; Flatbed truck; Pickup; Other
th: ประเภทรถบรรทุก: กระบะตู้ทึบ; รถดัมพ์; รถบรรทุกพื้นเรียบ; รถปิกอัพ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de caminhão: Caminhão baú; Caminhão basculante; Caminhão plataforma; Picape; Outro
fi: Kuorma-autotyyppi: Laatikkokuorma-auto; Kippiauto; Lavakuorma-auto; Pickup; Muu
ru: Тип грузовика: Грузовой фургон; Самосвал; Грузовик с бортовой платформой; Пикап; Другой
de: Lkw-Typ: Kastenwagen; Kipplaster; Tieflader; Pick-up; Sonstiges
vi: Loại xe tải: Xe tải thùng; Xe ben; Xe tải sàn phẳng; Xe bán tải; Khác
sk-SK: Typ nákladného auta: Skriňový kamión; Sklápač; Valník; Pickup; Iné
lt-LT: Sunkiasvorės transporto priemonės tipas: Sunkvežimis; Savivartis; Platforminis sunkvežimis; Pikapas; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta tovornega vozila: Tovornjak zabojnik; Tovornjak prekucnik; Tovornjak s kesonom; Potovornjak; Drugo
da: Lastbiltype: Kassevogn; Skraldevogn; Fladvogn; Pickup; Andet
bg-BG: Тип камион: Камион тип „Box truck“; Самосвал; Камион с равен борд; Пикап; Други
es: Tipo de camión: Camión caja; Camión volquete; Camión de plataforma; Pickup; Otros
zh-CN: 卡车类型: 箱式卡车; 自卸车; 平板车; 皮卡; 其他
ro-RO: Tip camion: Autocamion; Camion basculant; Camion cu platformă; Camionetă; Altele
hu: Teherautó típusa: Dobozos teherautó; Dömper; Platós teherautó; Pick-up; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta kamiona: Kamion sa sandukom; Kiper; Kamion s ravnom platformom; Kamionet; Ostalo
tr: Kamyon Tipi: Kapalı kasa kamyon; Çöp kamyonu; Açık kasa kamyon; Kamyonet; Diğer
fr: Type de camion: Camion fourgon; Camion bennes; Camion à plateau; Pickup; Autre
zh-TW: 卡車類型: 箱式卡車; 自卸卡車; 平板卡車; 敞篷小貨車; 其他
el: Τύπος φορτηγού: Φορτηγό κουτί; Φορτηγά ανατρεπόμενα; Φορτηγό επίπεδης κλίνης; Βελτίωση; Άλλο